Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4525
Settlor.

(a) For purposes of law of this state other than the Uniform Trust Decanting Act and subject to subsection (b) of this section, a settlor of a first trust is deemed to be the settlor of the second trust with respect to the portion of the principal of the first trust subject to the exercise of the decanting power.

(b) In determining settlor intent with respect to a second trust, the intent of a settlor of the first trust, a settlor of the second trust, and the authorized fiduciary may be considered.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 35.